Louisiana, session 2026, HB1259.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 14:313.2 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§313.2. Masked felony offense; enhanced penalty
A. Any person convicted of a felony offense or an offense punishable
pursuant to R.S. 14:329.7 and who, at the time of the commission of the offense, was
wearing a mask or other face covering with the intent to evade identification, shall
be subject to an enhanced penalty of up to two additional years of imprisonment with
or without hard labor.
B. The provisions of this Section do not apply to the exempted persons and
activities provided for in R.S. 14:313(C).